Maryland, session 2025, HB0149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0149*

HOUSE BILL 149
(DD) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES
THE AMOUNT OF ANY CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENTS MADE BY AN INDIVIDUAL DURING
THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT ARE:
(1) PAID TO ANOTHER PERSON ON BEHALF OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
CHILD; AND
(2) REQUIRED BY A COURT ORDER ISSUED BY ANY STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.